scripts/hfst_files/liheci_insertion_annotator.xfst
! Insertion Character Annotator
! Marks each character with its grammatical category
! Output format: Character:Tag+Character:Tag

! === Annotation Rules ===
! Use replace to add tags after each recognized character

! Aspect markers
define MarkAsp 了 -> 了 %: A S P E C T %+ ,
               过 -> 过 %: A S P E C T %+ ,
               着 -> 着 %: A S P E C T %+ ;

! Numerals
define MarkNum 一 -> 一 %: N U M %+ ,
               二 -> 二 %: N U M %+ ,
               两 -> 两 %: N U M %+ ,
               三 -> 三 %: N U M %+ ,
               四 -> 四 %: N U M %+ ,
               五 -> 五 %: N U M %+ ,
               六 -> 六 %: N U M %+ ,
               七 -> 七 %: N U M %+ ,
               八 -> 八 %: N U M %+ ,
               九 -> 九 %: N U M %+ ,
               十 -> 十 %: N U M %+ ,
               百 -> 百 %: N U M %+ ,
               千 -> 千 %: N U M %+ ,
               万 -> 万 %: N U M %+ ,
               几 -> 几 %: N U M %+ ,
               半 -> 半 %: N U M %+ ;

! Time words (hour-小时、minute-分钟、a while-会儿、whole life-辈子 etc.)
define MarkTime 时 -> 时 %: T I M E %+ ,
                分 -> 分 %: T I M E %+ ,
                秒 -> 秒 %: T I M E %+ ,
                钟 -> 钟 %: T I M E %+ ,
                刻 -> 刻 %: T I M E %+ ,
                会 -> 会 %: T I M E %+ ,
                儿 -> 儿 %: T I M E %+ ,
                辈 -> 辈 %: T I M E %+ ,
                子 -> 子 %: T I M E %+ ;

! Classifiers (expanded: add more liheci-specific classifiers)
define MarkClf 个 -> 个 %: C L F %+ ,
               次 -> 次 %: C L F %+ ,
               天 -> 天 %: C L F %+ ,
               句 -> 句 %: C L F %+ ,
               把 -> 把 %: C L F %+ ,
               场 -> 场 %: C L F %+ ,
               声 -> 声 %: C L F %+ ,
               手 -> 手 %: C L F %+ ,
               根 -> 根 %: C L F %+ ,
               支 -> 支 %: C L F %+ ,
               首 -> 首 %: C L F %+ ,
               趟 -> 趟 %: C L F %+ ,
               遍 -> 遍 %: C L F %+ ,
               下 -> 下 %: C L F %+ ,
               年 -> 年 %: C L F %+ ,
               月 -> 月 %: C L F %+ ,
               日 -> 日 %: C L F %+ ,
               周 -> 周 %: C L F %+ ,
               回 -> 回 %: C L F %+ ,
               顿 -> 顿 %: C L F %+ ,
               架 -> 架 %: C L F %+ ,
               针 -> 针 %: C L F %+ ,
               瓶 -> 瓶 %: C L F %+ ,
               斤 -> 斤 %: C L F %+ ,
               面 -> 面 %: C L F %+ ,
               口 -> 口 %: C L F %+ ,
               班 -> 班 %: C L F %+ ,
               份 -> 份 %: C L F %+ ,
               通 -> 通 %: C L F %+ ,
               军 -> 军 %: C L F %+ ,
               躬 -> 躬 %: C L F %+ ,
               礼 -> 礼 %: C L F %+ ,
               条 -> 条 %: C L F %+ ,
               担 -> 担 %: C L F %+ ,
               枪 -> 枪 %: C L F %+ ,
               杯 -> 杯 %: C L F %+ ;

! Pronouns (expanded: include 们, 谁, 自己, 大家, etc.)
! Note: Multi-char words use space-separated chars in XFST
define MarkPro 我 -> 我 %: P R O %+ ,
               你 -> 你 %: P R O %+ ,
               他 -> 他 %: P R O %+ ,
               她 -> 她 %: P R O %+ ,
               它 -> 它 %: P R O %+ ,
               们 -> 们 %: P R O %+ ,
               谁 -> 谁 %: P R O %+ ,
               自 -> 自 %: P R O %+ ,
               己 -> 己 %: P R O %+ ,
               您 -> 您 %: P R O %+ ;

! 的 (DE marker for possessive/attributive)
define MarkDe 的 -> 的 %: D E %+ ,
              之 -> 之 %: D E %+ ;

! Demonstratives (Demonstrative pronouns/articles: 这个、那个、etc.)
define MarkDem 这 -> 这 %: D E M %+ ,
               那 -> 那 %: D E M %+ ,
               这个 -> 这个 %: D E M %+ ,
               那个 -> 那个 %: D E M %+ ,
               这些 -> 这些 %: D E M %+ ,
               那些 -> 那些 %: D E M %+ ,
               某 -> 某 %: D E M %+ ,
               某个 -> 某个 %: D E M %+ ,
               每 -> 每 %: D E M %+ ,
               各 -> 各 %: D E M %+ ,
               哪 -> 哪 %: D E M %+ ,
               哪个 -> 哪个 %: D E M %+ ,
               哪些 -> 哪些 %: D E M %+ ,
               什么 -> 什么 %: D E M %+ ;

! Modifiers (expanded: add more common modifiers)
define MarkMod 好 -> 好 %: M O D %+ ,
               大 -> 大 %: M O D %+ ,
               小 -> 小 %: M O D %+ ,
               重 -> 重 %: M O D %+ ,
               轻 -> 轻 %: M O D %+ ,
               长 -> 长 %: M O D %+ ,
               短 -> 短 %: M O D %+ ,
               高 -> 高 %: M O D %+ ,
               厚 -> 厚 %: M O D %+ ,
               很 -> 很 %: M O D %+ ,
               整 -> 整 %: M O D %+ ,
               多 -> 多 %: M O D %+ ,
               少 -> 少 %: M O D %+ ,
               老 -> 老 %: M O D %+ ,
               远 -> 远 %: M O D %+ ,
               久 -> 久 %: M O D %+ ,
               热 -> 热 %: M O D %+ ,
               冷 -> 冷 %: M O D %+ ,
               快 -> 快 %: M O D %+ ,
               慢 -> 慢 %: M O D %+ ,
               紧 -> 紧 %: M O D %+ ,
               深 -> 深 %: M O D %+ ,
               透 -> 透 %: M O D %+ ,
               碎 -> 碎 %: M O D %+ ,
               丰 -> 丰 %: M O D %+ ,
               盛 -> 盛 %: M O D %+ ,
               优 -> 优 %: M O D %+ ,
               美 -> 美 %: M O D %+ ,
               烈 -> 烈 %: M O D %+ ,
               尽 -> 尽 %: M O D %+ ;

! Resultatives (expanded)
define MarkRes 完 -> 完 %: R E S %+ ,
               到 -> 到 %: R E S %+ ,
               掉 -> 掉 %: R E S %+ ,
               住 -> 住 %: R E S %+ ,
               成 -> 成 %: R E S %+ ,
               起 -> 起 %: R E S %+ ,
               不 -> 不 %: R E S %+ ,
               得 -> 得 %: R E S %+ ;

! Prepositions (PP markers - important for PP_IN_INSERTION validation)
define MarkPrep 跟 -> 跟 %: P R E P %+ ,
                和 -> 和 %: P R E P %+ ,
                与 -> 与 %: P R E P %+ ,
                向 -> 向 %: P R E P %+ ,
                对 -> 对 %: P R E P %+ ,
                给 -> 给 %: P R E P %+ ,
                为 -> 为 %: P R E P %+ ,
                被 -> 被 %: P R E P %+ ,
                同 -> 同 %: P R E P %+ ;

! === Compose All Annotations ===
define Annotator [
  MarkAsp .o.
  MarkNum .o.
  MarkTime .o.
  MarkClf .o.
  MarkPro .o.
  MarkDe .o.
  MarkDem .o.
  MarkMod .o.
  MarkRes .o.
  MarkPrep
];

regex Annotator;

save stack liheci_insertion_annotator.hfst
quit
